Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5850.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 27-38.2 of the General Laws entitled "Insurance Coverage for Mental
Illness and Substance Use Disorders" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-38.2-7. Reimbursement from private insurers.
Every individual or group health insurance contract, plan, or policy delivered, issued, or
renewed by an insurer, health maintenance organization, nonprofit or for-profit health service
corporation on or after January 1, 2026, that provides benefits to individual subscribers and
members within the state, or to all group members having a principal place of employment within
the state, shall reimburse child service providers for therapy services offered through EOHHS
certified Kids Connect/Therapeutic Services.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001641
========